Rhode Island statutes. Title 22 General Assembly
Chapter 2 Composition of House of Representatives
The thirty-ninth district shall also consist of all of that part of the town of Hopkinton bounded by a line beginning at the Rhode Island — Connecticut boundary line and Camp Yawgoog Rd; thence easterly, southerly and northeasterly on Camp Yawgoog Rd to Spring St; thence southerly on Spring St to Wincheck Pond Rd; thence southerly and easterly on Wincheck Pond Rd to Spring St; thence easterly on Spring St to Sawmill Rd; thence northerly on Sawmill Rd to Dye Hill Rd; thence easterly on Dye Hill Rd to Fairview Ave; thence southeasterly on Fairview Ave to Bank St; thence southwesterly on Bank St to Main St; thence southwesterly on Main St to Brushy Brook; thence southerly on Brushy Brook to the Hopkinton — Richmond boundary line; thence northerly on the Hopkinton — Richmond boundary line to the Exeter — Hopkinton boundary line; thence westerly on the Hopkinton — Richmond boundary line to the Rhode Island — Connecticut boundary line; thence southerly on the Rhode Island — Connecticut boundary line to the point of origin.

The thirty-ninth district shall also consist of all of that part of the town of Exeter bounded by a line beginning at the Exeter — South Kingstown boundary line and South County Trail; thence northerly on South County Trail to South Rd; thence northerly on South Rd to census block 440090505003086; thence southeasterly on the northern boundary line of census blocks 440090505003092 and 440090505003091 to the Exeter — North Kingstown boundary line; thence northerly on the Exeter — North Kingstown boundary line to the East Greenwich — Exeter boundary line; thence westerly on the East Greenwich — Exeter boundary line to the West Greenwich — Exeter boundary line; thence westerly on the West Greenwich — Exeter boundary line to the Rhode Island — Connecticut boundary line; thence southerly on the Rhode Island — Connecticut boundary line to the Exeter — Hopkinton boundary line; thence easterly on the Exeter — Hopkinton boundary line to the Exeter — Richmond boundary line; thence easterly and southerly on the Exeter — Richmond boundary line to the Exeter — South Kingstown boundary line; thence easterly on the Exeter — South Kingstown boundary line to the point of origin.

Fortieth district:
The fortieth representative district shall consist of all of the town of Foster.

The fortieth representative district shall also consist of all of that part of the town of Glocester bounded by a line beginning at the Glocester — Scituate boundary line and Sawmill Rd; thence northerly on Sawmill Rd to Putnam Pike; thence southeasterly on Putnam Pike to the Glocester — Smithfield boundary line; thence northerly on the Glocester — Smithfield boundary line to the Burrillville — Glocester boundary line; thence westerly on the Burrillville — Glocester boundary line to Reservoir Rd; thence southerly on Reservoir Rd to Putnam Pike; thence westerly on Putnam pike to the Rhode Island — Connecticut boundary line; thence southerly on the Rhode Island — Connecticut boundary line to the Glocester — Foster boundary line; thence easterly on the Glocester — Foster boundary line to the Glocester — Scituate boundary line; thence easterly on the Glocester — Scituate boundary line to the point of origin.

The fortieth representative district shall also consist of all of that part of the town of Coventry bounded by a line beginning at the Foster — Coventry boundary line and Victory Highway; thence southerly on Victory Highway to the Coventry — West Greenwich boundary line; thence westerly on the Coventry — West Greenwich boundary line to the Rhode Island — Connecticut boundary line; thence northerly on the Rhode Island — Connecticut boundary line to the Foster — Coventry boundary line; thence easterly on the Foster — Coventry boundary line to the point of origin.

Forty-first district:
The forty-first representative district shall consist of all of that part of the city of Cranston bounded by a line beginning at the Johnston — Cranston boundary line and Comstock Pkwy; thence southerly on Comstock Pkwy to S Comstock Pkwy; thence southerly on S Comstock Pkwy to census block 440070145012036; thence southwesterly on the boundary line between census blocks 440070145012036 — 440070145012014 and 440070145012036 — 440070145012037 to 440070145013004; thence southerly and southwesterly on the eastern boundary line of census block 440070145013004 to Furnace Hill Brook; thence southeasterly on Furnace Hill Brook to census block 440070145013048; thence southerly on the boundary line between census blocks 440070145013048 — 440070145013025 to Hope Rd; thence southwesterly on Hope Rd to Burlingame Rd; thence easterly on Burlingame Rd to Lippitt Brook; thence southerly on Lippitt Brook to the Cranston — Coventry boundary line; thence westerly on the Cranston — Coventry boundary line to the Scituate — Cranston boundary line; thence northerly on the Scituate — Cranston boundary line to the Johnston — Cranston boundary line; thence easterly on the Johnston — Cranston boundary line to the point of origin.

The forty-first representative district shall also consist of all of the town of Scituate.

Forty-second district:
The forty-second representative district shall consist of all of that part of the town of Johnston bounded by a line beginning at the Johnston — Providence boundary line and Plainfield St; thence southerly on Plainfield St to Morgan Ave; thence westerly on Morgan Ave to School St; thence southwesterly on School St to census block 440070125001021; thence northerly on the eastern boundary line of census blocks 440070125001021 and 440070125001014 to Downing Dr; thence northerly on Downing Dr to Central Ave; thence northeasterly on Central Ave to Alden St; thence northerly on Alden St to Boundary Ave; thence easterly on Boundary Ave to Harding Ave; thence northerly on Harding Ave to York Rd; thence easterly on York Rd to census block 440070124021024; thence northerly and easterly on the boundary line between census blocks 440070124021024 — 440070124021025 and 440070124021024 — 440070124021027 to the Providence — Johnston boundary line; thence northerly on the Johnston — Providence boundary line to Hartford Ave; thence northwesterly on Hartford Ave to the Scituate — Johnston boundary line; thence southerly on the Scituate — Johnston boundary line to the Johnston — Cranston boundary line; thence easterly and northeasterly on the Johnston — Cranston boundary line to the Providence — Johnston boundary line; thence northwesterly on the Providence — Johnston boundary line to the point of origin.

The forty-second representative district shall also consist of all of that part of the town of Cranston bounded by a line beginning at the Johnston — Cranston boundary line and Atwood Ave; thence southeasterly on Atwood Ave to Royal Ave; thence southerly on Royal Ave to Cannon St; thence easterly on Cannon St to Yard St; thence southerly on Yard St to Elena St; thence westerly on Elena St to Village Ave; thence northwesterly on Village Ave to Harcourt St; thence southwesterly on Harcourt St to census block 440070148003010; thence westerly and southerly on the northern and western boundary line of census block 440070148003010 to census block 440070148003022; thence westerly on the northern boundary line of census blocks 440070148003022 and 440070148003032 to Arrow Way; thence southerly on Arrow Way to Scituate Ave; thence westerly on Scituate Ave to I-295; thence northerly on I-295 to Meshanticut Brook; thence easterly on Meshanticut Brook to census block 440070148002024; thence northerly on the boundary line between census blocks 440070148002024 — 440070148002027, 440070148002024 — 440070148002025, 440070148002025 — 440070148002014 and 440070148002025 — 440070148002011 to the Johnston — Cranston boundary line; thence easterly on the Johnston — Cranston boundary line to the point of origin.

Forty-third district:
The forty-third representative district shall consist of all of that part of the town of Johnston bounded by a line beginning at the Smithfield — Johnston boundary line and Sanderson Rd; thence southerly on Sanderson Rd to Brown Ave; thence southwesterly on Brown Ave to Hartford Ave; thence easterly on Hartford Ave to the Johnston — Providence boundary line; thence northerly and easterly on the Johnston — Providence boundary line to the North Providence — Johnston boundary line; thence northerly on the North Providence — Johnston boundary line to the Smithfield — Johnston boundary line; thence westerly on the Smithfield — Johnston boundary line to the point of origin.

Forty-fourth district:
The forty-fourth representative district shall consist of all of that part of the town of Lincoln bounded by a line beginning at the Smithfield — Lincoln boundary line and Limerock Rd; thence easterly on Limerock Rd to Wilbur Rd; thence northeasterly on Wilbur Rd to State Route 146; thence southerly on State Route 146 to the Lincoln — North Providence boundary line; thence westerly on the Lincoln — North Providence boundary line to the Smithfield — Lincoln boundary line; thence northerly on the Smithfield — Lincoln boundary line to the point of origin.

The forty-fourth representative district shall also consist of all of that part of the town of Johnston bounded by a line beginning at the Smithfield — Johnston boundary line and Sanderson Rd; thence southerly on Sanderson Rd to Brown Ave; thence southwesterly on Brown Ave to Hartford Ave; thence westerly on Hartford Ave to the Scituate — Johnston boundary line; thence northerly on the Scituate — Johnston boundary line to the Smithfield — Johnston boundary line; thence easterly on the Smithfield — Johnston boundary line to the point of origin.

The forty-fourth representative district shall also consist of all of that part of the town of Smithfield bounded by a line beginning at the Smithfield — Johnston boundary line and the Glocester — Smithfield boundary line; thence northerly on the Glocester — Smithfield boundary line to Smith Ave; thence northeasterly on Smith Ave to Putnam Pike; thence easterly on Putnam Pike to I-295; thence northerly on I-295 to Douglas Pike; thence southeasterly on Douglas Pike to Limerock Rd; thence northeasterly on Limerock Rd to the Smithfield — Lincoln boundary line; thence southerly on the Smithfield — Lincoln boundary line to the Smithfield — North Providence boundary line; thence westerly on the Smithfield — North Providence boundary line to the Smithfield — Johnston boundary line: thence westerly on the Smithfield — Johnston boundary line to the point of origin.

Forty-fifth district:
The forty-fifth representative district shall consist of all of that part of the town of Lincoln bounded by a line beginning at the intersection of the North Smithfield — Lincoln boundary line and Sayles Hill Rd; thence northeasterly on Sayles Hill Rd to Old River Rd; thence southeasterly on Old River Rd to I-295; thence easterly on I-295 to the Lincoln — Cumberland boundary line; thence northerly on the Lincoln — Cumberland boundary line to the North Smithfield — Lincoln boundary line; thence southerly on the North Smithfield — Lincoln boundary line to the point of origin.

The forty-fifth representative district shall also consist of all of that part of the town of Cumberland bounded by a line beginning at the Lincoln — Cumberland boundary line and George Washington Highway; thence easterly on the George Washington Highway to Mendon Rd; thence southerly on Mendon Rd to Angell Rd; thence northeasterly on Angell Rd to census block 440070114051005; thence northwesterly on the boundary line between census blocks 440070114051005 — 40070114051006 to census block 440070114051004; thence easterly on the boundary line between census blocks 440070114051005 — 440070114051004 to the utility right of way; thence northwesterly on the utility right of way to Pound Rd; thence easterly on Pound Rd to Little Pond County Rd; thence northerly on Little Pond County Rd to Nate Whipple Highway; thence westerly on Nate Whipple Highway to Mendon Rd; thence northerly on Mendon Rd to W Wrentham Rd; thence northeasterly on W Wrentham Rd to the utility right of way; thence northwesterly on the utility right of way to the Woonsocket — Cumberland boundary line; thence southwesterly on the Woonsocket — Cumberland boundary line to the Lincoln — Cumberland boundary line; thence southeasterly on the Lincoln — Cumberland boundary line to the point of origin.

Forty-sixth district:
The forty-sixth district shall consist of all of that part of the town of Lincoln bounded by a line beginning at the intersection of the Lincoln — North Providence boundary line and the State Route 146; thence northerly on the State Route 146 to Wilbur Rd; thence southwesterly on Wilbur Rd to the Smithfield — Lincoln boundary line; thence northerly on the Smithfield — Lincoln boundary line to the North Smithfield — Lincoln boundary line; thence northerly on the North Smithfield — Lincoln boundary line to Sayles Hill Rd; thence northeasterly on Sayles Hill Rd to Old River Rd; thence southeasterly on Old River Rd to I-295; thence easterly on 1-295 to the Lincoln — Cumberland boundary line; thence southerly on the Lincoln — Cumberland boundary line to the Lincoln — Central Falls boundary line; thence westerly and southerly on the Lincoln — Central Falls boundary line to the Lincoln — Pawtucket boundary line; thence westerly on the Lincoln — Pawtucket boundary line to the Lincoln — North Providence boundary line; thence westerly on the Lincoln — North Providence boundary line to the point of origin.

The forty-sixth representative district shall also consist of all of that part of the city of Pawtucket bounded by a line beginning at the Lincoln — Pawtucket boundary line and Smithfield Ave; thence southerly on Smithfield Ave to Chandler Ave; thence easterly on Chandler Ave to Fairlawn Ave; thence southerly on Fairlawn Ave to Mineral Spring Ave; thence easterly on Mineral Spring Ave to the Moshassuck River; thence northerly on the Moshassuck River to the Lincoln — Pawtucket boundary line; thence westerly on the Lincoln — Pawtucket boundary line to the point of origin.

Forty-seventh district:
The forty-seventh representative district shall consist of all of that part of the town of Burrillville bounded by a line beginning at the Rhode Island — Massachusetts boundary line and Sherman Farm Rd; thence westerly on the Rhode Island — Massachusetts boundary line to the Rhode Island — Connecticut boundary line; thence southerly on the Rhode Island — Connecticut boundary line to the Burrillville — Glocester boundary line; thence easterly on the Burrillville — Glocester boundary line to Cooper Hill Rd; thence northwesterly on Cooper Hill Rd to census block 440070130024026; thence northerly on the boundary line between census blocks 440070130024026 — 440070130024017 to Tarklin Rd; thence westerly on Tarklin Rd to Mapleville Main St; thence westerly on Mapleville Main St to Clear River; thence northerly on Clear River and Branch River to Victory Hwy; thence southwesterly on Victory Hwy to Joslin Rd; thence northerly on Joslin Rd to Spring Lake Rd; thence northwesterly on Spring Lake Rd to W Ironstone Rd; thence westerly on W Ironstone Rd to Sherman Farm Rd; thence northeasterly on Sherman Farm Rd to the point of origin.

The forty-seventh representative district shall consist of all of that part of the town of Glocester bounded by a line beginning at the Burrillville — Glocester boundary line and Reservoir Rd; thence westerly on the Burrillville — Glocester boundary line to the Rhode Island — Connecticut boundary line; thence southerly on the Rhode Island — Connecticut boundary line to Putnam Pike; thence easterly on Putnam Pike to Reservoir Rd; thence northerly on Reservoir Rd to the point of origin.

Forty-eighth district:
The forty-eighth representative district shall consist of all of that part of the town of North Smithfield bounded by a line beginning at the Rhode Island — Massachusetts boundary line and St Paul St; thence westerly on the Rhode Island — Massachusetts boundary line to the Burrillville — North Smithfield boundary line; thence southerly on the Burrillville — North Smithfield boundary line to the North Smithfield — Smithfield boundary line; thence easterly on the North Smithfield — Smithfield boundary line to the North Smithfield — Lincoln boundary line; thence northerly on the North Smithfield — Lincoln boundary line to the North Smithfield — Woonsocket boundary line; thence northwesterly on the North Smithfield — Woonsocket boundary line to Great Rd; thence northwesterly on Great Rd to St Paul St; thence northeasterly on St Paul St to the point of origin.

The forty-eighth representative district shall also consist of all of that part of the town of Burrillville bounded by a line beginning at the Rhode Island — Massachusetts boundary line and Sherman Farm Rd; thence southerly on Sherman Farm Rd to W Ironstone Rd; thence easterly on W Ironstone Rd to Spring Lake Rd; thence southerly on Spring Lake Rd to Joslin Rd; thence southerly on Joslin Rd to Victory Hwy; thence northeasterly on Victory Hwy to Branch River; thence southerly on Branch River and Clear River to Mapleville Main St; thence easterly on Mapleville Main St to Tarklin Rd; thence easterly on Tarklin Rd to census block 440070130024017; thence southerly on the boundary line between census blocks 440070130024017 — 440070130024026 to Cooper Hill Rd; thence southerly on Cooper Hill Rd to the Burrillville — Glocester boundary line; thence easterly on the Burrillville — Glocester boundary line to the Burrillville — North Smithfield boundary line; thence northerly on the Burrillville — North Smithfield boundary line to the Rhode Island — Massachusetts boundary line; thence easterly on the Rhode Island — Massachusetts boundary line to the point of origin.

Forty-ninth district:
The forty-ninth representative district shall consist of all of that part of the city of Woonsocket bounded by a line beginning at the Rhode Island — Massachusetts boundary line and Rathbun St; thence westerly on the Rhode Island — Massachusetts boundary line to the North Smithfield — Woonsocket boundary line; thence southerly and westerly on the North Smithfield — Woonsocket boundary line to railroad tracks; thence northeasterly on railroad tracks to Olo St; thence easterly on Olo St to Center St; thence southerly on Center St to South St; thence southeasterly on South St to S Main St; thence northeasterly on S Main St to the Blackstone River; thence easterly and northeasterly on the Blackstone River to Court St; thence southeasterly on Court St to Hamlet Ave; thence easterly on Hamlet Ave to Cumberland St; thence northwesterly on Cumberland St to Cass Ave; thence easterly on Cass Ave to Dulude Ave; thence northerly on Dulude Ave to census block 440070183001006; thence easterly on the boundary line between census blocks 440070183001017 — 440070183001006 and 440070183001017 — 440070183001005 to Heroux Ave; thence northerly on Heroux Ave to Elm St; thence westerly and northwesterly on Elm St to E School St; thence westerly on E School St to Rathbun St; thence northerly on Rathbun St to the point of origin.

The forty-ninth representative district shall also consist of all of that part of the town of North Smithfield bounded by a line beginning at the Rhode Island — Massachusetts boundary line and Saint Paul St; thence southwesterly on Saint Paul St to Great Rd; thence southeasterly on Great Rd to the North Smithfield — Woonsocket boundary line; thence northerly on the North Smithfield — Woonsocket boundary line to the Rhode Island — Massachusetts boundary line; thence westerly on the Rhode Island — Massachusetts boundary line to the point of origin.

Fiftieth district:
The fiftieth representative district shall consist of all of that part of the city of Woonsocket bounded by a line beginning at the intersection of the Woonsocket — Cumberland boundary line and Mendon Rd; thence northwesterly on Mendon Rd to Cumberland Hill Rd; thence northwesterly on Cumberland Hill Rd to Hamlet Ave; thence westerly on Hamlet Ave to Court St; thence westerly on Court St to the Blackstone River; thence southerly and westerly on the Blackstone River to S Main St; thence southwesterly on S Main St to South St; thence northwesterly on South St to Center St; thence northerly on Center St to Olo St; thence westerly on Olo St to railroad tracks; thence southwesterly on railroad tracks to the North Smithfield — Woonsocket boundary line; thence southeasterly on the North Smithfield — Woonsocket boundary line to the Woonsocket — Cumberland boundary line; thence northeasterly on the on the Woonsocket — Cumberland boundary line to the point of origin.

Fifty-first district:
The fifty-first representative district shall consist of all of that part of the city of Woonsocket bounded by a line beginning at the Rhode Island — Massachusetts boundary line and Rathbun St; thence southerly on Rathbun St to East School St; thence easterly on East School St to Elm St; thence southeasterly on Elm St to Heroux Ave; thence southerly on Heroux Ave to census block 440070183001017; thence westerly on the boundary line between census blocks 440070183001017 — 440070183001006 and 440070183001017 — 440070183001005 to Dulude Ave; thence southerly on Dulude Ave to Cass Ave; thence westerly on Cass Ave to Cumberland St; thence southerly on Cumberland St to Cumberland Hill Rd; thence southeasterly on Cumberland Hill Rd to the Woonsocket — Cumberland boundary line; thence northeasterly on the Woonsocket — Cumberland boundary line to the Rhode Island — Massachusetts boundary line; thence westerly on the Rhode Island — Massachusetts boundary line to the point of origin.

The fifty-first representative district shall also consist of all of that part of the town of Cumberland bounded by a line beginning at the Rhode Island — Massachusetts boundary line and the Woonsocket — Cumberland boundary line; thence southwesterly on the Woonsocket — Cumberland boundary line to the utility right of way; thence southeasterly on the utility right of way to W Wrentham Rd; thence northerly on W Wrentham Rd to Pine Swamp Rd; thence easterly on Pine Swamp Rd to Little St; thence northerly on Little St to Grants Mill Rd; thence easterly on Grants Mill Rd to Cook Rd; thence northeasterly on Cook Rd to the Rhode Island — Massachusetts boundary line; thence westerly on the Rhode Island — Massachusetts boundary line to the point of origin.

Fifty-second district:
The fifty-second representative district shall consist of all of that part of the town of Cumberland bounded by a line beginning at the Rhode Island — Massachusetts boundary line and Dexter St; thence westerly on Dexter St to High St; thence northerly on High St to Diamond Hill Rd; thence northerly on Diamond Hill Rd to I-295; thence westerly on I-295 to the utility right of way; thence northwesterly on the utility right of way to Pound Rd; thence easterly on Pound Rd to Little Pond County Rd; thence northerly on Little Pond County Rd to Nate Whipple Highway; thence westerly on Nate Whipple Highway to Mendon Rd; thence northerly on Mendon Rd to W Wrentham Rd; thence northerly on W Wrentham Rd to Pine Swamp Rd; thence easterly on Pine Swamp Rd to Little St; thence northerly on Little St to Grants Mill Rd; thence easterly on Grants Mill Rd to Cook Rd; thence northerly on Cook Rd to the Rhode Island — Massachusetts boundary line; thence easterly and southerly on the Rhode Island — Massachusetts boundary line to the point of origin.

Fifty-third district: The fifty-third representative district shall consist of all of that part of the town of Glocester bounded by a line beginning at the Glocester — Scituate boundary line and Sawmill Rd; thence northerly on Sawmill Rd to Putnam Pike; thence southeasterly on Putnam Pike to the Glocester — Smithfield boundary line; thence southerly on the Glocester — Smithfield boundary line to the Glocester — Scituate boundary line; thence westerly on the Glocester — Scituate boundary line to the point of origin.

The fifty-third representative district shall also consist of all of that part of the town of Smithfield bounded by a line beginning at the Glocester — Smithfield boundary line and Smith Ave; thence northeasterly on Smith Ave to Putnam Pike; thence easterly on Putnam Pike to I-295; thence northerly on I-295 to Douglas Pike; thence southeasterly on Douglas Pike to Limerock Rd; thence northeasterly on Limerock Rd to the Smithfield — Lincoln boundary line; thence northerly on the Smithfield — Lincoln boundary line to the North Smithfield — Smithfield boundary line; thence westerly on the North Smithfield — Smithfield boundary line to line to the Glocester — Smithfield boundary line; thence southerly on the Glocester — Smithfield boundary line point of origin.

Fifty-fourth district:
The fifty-fourth representative district shall also consist of all of that part of the town of North Providence bounded by a line beginning at the North Providence — Providence boundary line and Hillside Dr; thence westerly on Hillside Dr to Longwood Ave; thence northwesterly on Longwood Ave to Woodbine St; thence northerly on Woodbine St to Sherman Ave; thence westerly on Sherman Ave to High Service Ave; thence northerly on High Service Ave to Superior View Blvd; thence westerly on Superior View Blvd to Lookout Ave; thence southerly on Lookout Ave to Smith St; thence southeasterly on Smith St to Homewood Ave; thence southerly on Homewood Ave to Olney Ave; thence westerly on Olney Ave to Belcourt Ave; thence southerly on Belcourt Ave to the northern boundary line of Rhode Island College; thence westerly on the northern boundary line of Rhode Island College to Fruit Hill Ave; thence southwesterly on Fruit Hill Ave to Lyman Ave; thence westerly on Lyman Ave to Woonasquatucket Ave; thence northwesterly on Woonasquatucket Ave to Testa Dr; thence westerly on Testa Dr and its extension to the Johnston — North Providence boundary line; thence northwesterly on the Johnston — North Providence boundary line to the Smithfield — North Providence boundary line; thence northeasterly on the Smithfield — North Providence boundary line to the Lincoln — North Providence boundary line; thence northeasterly on the Lincoln — North Providence boundary line to Douglas Ave; thence southeasterly on Douglas Ave to Wenscott Ln; thence southwesterly on Wenscott Ln to Meadow View Blvd; thence easterly and southwesterly on Meadow View Blvd to Rayna Rd; thence southerly on Rayna Rd to Smithfield Rd; thence southeasterly on Smithfield Rd to the North Providence — Providence boundary line; thence westerly on the North Providence — Providence boundary line to the point of origin.

Fifty-fifth district:
The fifty-fifth representative district shall consist of all of that part of the town of North Providence bounded by a line beginning at the Lincoln — North Providence boundary line and Douglas Ave; thence southeasterly on Douglas Ave to Wenscott Ln; thence southwesterly on Wenscott Ln to Meadow View Blvd; thence easterly and southwesterly on Meadow View Blvd to Rayna Rd; thence southerly on Rayna Rd to Smithfield Rd; thence southeasterly on Smithfield Rd to the North Providence — Providence boundary line; thence northeasterly on the North Providence boundary line to the North Providence — Pawtucket boundary line; thence northerly on North Providence — Pawtucket boundary line to the Lincoln — North Providence boundary line; thence westerly on the Lincoln — North Providence boundary line to the point of origin.

Fifty-sixth district:
The fifty-sixth representative district shall consist of all of that part of the city of Central Falls bounded by a line beginning at the Central Falls — Pawtucket boundary line and Roosevelt Ave; thence southerly on Roosevelt Ave to Charles St; thence westerly on Charles St to Sacred Heart Ave; thence westerly on Sacred Heart Ave to Railroad St; thence northerly on Railroad St to Foundry St; thence westerly on Foundry St to Broad St; thence northerly on Broad St to Cowden St; thence westerly on Cowden St to Washington St; thence northwesterly on Washington St to Hunt St; thence southwesterly on Hunt St to W Hunt St; thence westerly on W Hunt St to Lonsdale Ave; thence southerly on Lonsdale Ave to Cleveland St; thence westerly on Cleveland St to the Central Falls — Lincoln boundary line; thence southerly on the Central Falls — Lincoln boundary line to the Central Falls — Pawtucket boundary line; thence easterly and northerly on the Central Falls — Pawtucket boundary line to the point of origin.

Fifty-seventh district:
The fifty-seventh representative district shall consist of all of that part of the town of Cumberland bounded by a line beginning at the Rhode Island — Massachusetts boundary line and Dexter St; thence westerly on Dexter St to High St; thence northerly on High St to Diamond Hill Rd; thence northerly on Diamond Hill Rd to I-295; thence westerly on I-295 to the utility right of way; thence southeasterly on the utility right of way to census block 440070114051005; thence westerly and southerly on the boundary line between census blocks 440070114051005 — 440070114051004 and 440070114051005 — 440070114051006 to Angell Rd; thence southwesterly on Angell Rd to Mendon Rd; thence northerly on Mendon Rd to George Washington Highway; thence westerly on George Washington Highway to the Lincoln — Cumberland boundary line; thence southeasterly on the Lincoln — Cumberland boundary line to the Cumberland — Central Falls boundary line; thence easterly and southerly on the Cumberland — Central Falls boundary line to the Rhode Island — Massachusetts boundary line; thence northerly on the Rhode Island — Massachusetts boundary line to the point of origin.

The fifty-seventh representative district shall also consist of all of that part of the city of Central Falls bounded by a line beginning at the Central Falls — Pawtucket boundary line and the Amtrak RR; thence southwesterly on the Amtrak RR to High St; thence northerly on High St to Blackstone St; thence westerly on Blackstone St to Broad St; thence northerly on Broad St to Cottage St; thence westerly on Cottage St to Hunt St; thence southwesterly on Hunt St to W Hunt St; thence southwesterly on W Hunt St to Lonsdale Ave; thence southerly on Lonsdale Ave to Cleveland St; thence westerly on Cleveland St to the Central Falls — Lincoln boundary line; thence northerly and easterly on the Central Falls — Lincoln boundary line to the Cumberland — Central Falls boundary line; thence easterly and southerly on the Cumberland — Central Falls boundary line to the Central Falls — Pawtucket boundary line; thence southerly on the Central Falls — Pawtucket boundary line to the point of origin.

Fifty-eighth district:
The fifty-eighth representative district shall consist of all of that part of the city of Pawtucket bounded by a line beginning at the Lincoln — Pawtucket boundary line and Smithfield Ave; thence southerly on Smithfield Ave to Chandler Ave; thence easterly on Chandler Ave to Fairlawn Ave; thence southerly on Fairlawn Ave to Mineral Spring Ave; thence easterly on Mineral Spring Ave to the Moshassuck River; thence northerly on the Moshassuck River to the Lincoln — Pawtucket boundary line; thence easterly on the Lincoln — Pawtucket boundary line to the Central Falls — Pawtucket boundary line; thence easterly on the Central Falls — Pawtucket boundary line to the Blackstone River; thence southerly on the Blackstone River to I-95; thence westerly on I-95 to George St; thence northerly on George St to Church St; thence westerly on Church St; to Mineral Spring Ave; thence westerly on Mineral Spring Ave to Lonsdale Ave; thence southerly on Lonsdale Ave to Thurston St; thence southwesterly on Thurston St to I-95; thence southwesterly on I-95 to the Pawtucket — Providence boundary line; thence westerly on the Pawtucket — Providence boundary line to the Pawtucket — North Providence boundary line; thence northerly on the Pawtucket — North Providence boundary line to the Lincoln — Pawtucket boundary line; thence easterly on the Lincoln — Pawtucket boundary line to the point of origin.

Fifty-ninth district:
The fifty-ninth representative district shall consist of all of that part of the city of Pawtucket bounded by a line beginning at the intersection of Pawtucket — Providence boundary line and I-95; thence easterly on the Pawtucket — Providence boundary line to the Seekonk River; thence northerly on the Seekonk River to I-95; thence westerly on I-95 to George St; thence northerly on George St to Church St; thence westerly on Church St to Mineral Spring Ave; thence westerly on Mineral Spring Ave to Lonsdale Ave; thence southerly on Lonsdale Ave to Thurston St; thence southwesterly on Thurston St to I-95; thence southwesterly on I-95 to the point of origin.

Sixtieth district:
The sixtieth representative district shall consist of all of that part of the city of Pawtucket bounded by a line beginning at the Rhode Island — Massachusetts boundary line and Newport Ave; thence southerly on Newport Ave to Cottage St; thence southwesterly on Cottage St to Mendon Ave; thence southerly on Mendon Ave to Central Ave; thence easterly on Central Ave to York Ave; thence southerly on York Ave to Armistice Blvd; thence westerly on Armistice Blvd to George Bennett Hwy; thence northerly on George Bennett Hwy to Central Ave; thence southwesterly on Central Ave to Cottage St; thence southwesterly on Cottage St to Exchange St; thence westerly on Exchange St to Broadway; thence southwesterly on Broadway to the Blackstone River; thence northerly on the Blackstone River to the Central Falls — Pawtucket boundary line; thence northerly on the Central Falls — Pawtucket boundary line to the Rhode Island — Massachusetts boundary line; thence easterly on the Rhode Island — Massachusetts boundary line to the point of origin.

The sixtieth representative district shall also consist of all of that part of the city of Central Falls bounded by a line beginning at the Central Falls — Pawtucket boundary line and the Amtrak RR; thence southwesterly on the Amtrak RR to High St; thence northerly on High St to Blackstone St; thence westerly on Blackstone St to Broad St; thence northerly on Broad St to Cottage St; thence westerly on Cottage St to Hunt St; thence southwesterly on Hunt St to Washington St; thence southeasterly on Washington St to Cowden St; thence easterly on Cowden St to Broad St; thence southerly on Broad St to Foundry St; thence easterly on Foundry St to Railroad St; thence southerly on Railroad St to Sacred Heart Ave; thence easterly on Sacred Heart Ave to Charles St; thence easterly on Charles St to Roosevelt Ave; thence northerly on Roosevelt Ave to the Central Falls — Pawtucket boundary line; thence northerly on the Central Falls — Pawtucket boundary line to the point of origin.

Sixty-first district:
The sixty-first representative district shall consist of all of that part of the city of Pawtucket bounded by a line beginning at the Rhode Island — Massachusetts boundary line and Newport Ave; thence southerly on Newport Ave to Cottage St; thence southwesterly on Cottage St to Mendon Ave; thence southerly on Mendon Ave to Central Ave; thence easterly on Central Ave to York Ave; thence southerly on York Ave to Balch St; thence easterly on Balch St to Burgess Ave; thence northerly on Burgess Ave to Empire St; thence easterly on Empire St to Bloomfield St; thence southerly on Bloomfield St to Federal St; thence easterly on Federal St to Gates St; thence easterly on Gates St to Oswald St; thence northerly on Oswald St to Armistice Blvd; thence southeasterly on Armistice Blvd to the Rhode Island — Massachusetts boundary line; thence northerly and westerly on the Rhode Island — Massachusetts boundary line to the point of origin.

Sixty-second district:
The sixty-second representative district shall consist of all of that part of the city of Pawtucket bounded by a line beginning at I-95 and Prospect St; thence southeasterly on Prospect St to census block 440070171003019 and the utility right of way; thence northeasterly on the utility right of way to the railroad tracks; thence southerly on the railroad tracks to the Pawtucket — East Providence boundary line; thence easterly on the Pawtucket — East Providence boundary line to Ten Mile River; thence northerly on the Ten Mile River to Armistice Blvd; thence northwesterly on Armistice Blvd to Oswald St; thence southerly on Oswald St to Gates St; thence westerly on Gates St to Federal St; thence westerly on Federal St to Bloomfield St; thence northerly on Bloomfield St to Empire St; thence westerly on Empire St to Burgess Ave; thence southerly on Burgess Ave to Balch St; thence westerly on Balch St to York Ave; thence northerly on York Ave to Armistice Blvd; thence westerly on Armistice Blvd to George Bennett Hwy; thence northerly on George Bennett Hwy to Central Ave; thence southwesterly on Central Ave to Cottage St; thence southwesterly on Cottage St to Exchange St; thence westerly on Exchange St to Broadway; thence southwesterly on Broadway to the Blackstone River; thence southerly on the Blackstone River and the Seekonk River to I-95; thence northeasterly on I-95 to the point of origin.

Sixty-third district:
The sixty-third representative district shall consist of all of that part of the city of East Providence bounded by a line beginning at the Rhode Island — Massachusetts boundary line and I-195; thence westerly on I-195 to Broadway; thence northerly on Broadway to N Broadway; thence northerly on N Broadway to Central Ave; thence northwesterly on Central Ave to Massasoit Ave; thence northeasterly on Massasoit Ave to Dexter Rd; thence northwesterly on Dexter Rd to the railroad tracks; thence northeasterly on the railroad tracks to Omega Pond; thence northwesterly on Omega Pond to the New York New Haven and Hartford RR; thence northerly on the New York New Haven and Hartford RR to the Pawtucket — East Providence boundary line; thence easterly on the Pawtucket — East Providence boundary line to the Rhode Island — Massachusetts boundary line; thence southerly on the Rhode Island — Massachusetts boundary line to the point of origin.

The sixty-third representative district shall also consist of all of that part of the city of Pawtucket bounded by a line beginning at the Rhode Island — Massachusetts boundary line and the Pawtucket — East Providence boundary line; thence westerly on the Pawtucket — East Providence boundary line to Ten Mile River; thence northerly on the Ten Mile River to Armistice Blvd; thence southeasterly on Armistice Blvd to the Rhode Island — Massachusetts boundary line; thence southerly on the Rhode Island — Massachusetts boundary line to the point of origin.

Sixty-fourth district: